Florida, session 2026, SB466.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 21 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 22 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 23 public records.â 24 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 25 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 26 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 27 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 28 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 29 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 30 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 31 property information that may reveal the home address. 32 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 33 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 34 c.ââLegal assistantâ means any employee of the office of 35 the public defender or the office of criminal conflict and civil 36 regional counsel other than a public defender, an assistant 37 public defender, a criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 38 or an assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel. 39 d.c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 40 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 41 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 42 communications devices. 43 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 44 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 45 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 46 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 47 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 48 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 49 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 50 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 51 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 52 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 53 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 54 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 55 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 56 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 57 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 58 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 59 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 60 Constitution. 61 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 62 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 63 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 64 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 65 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 66 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 67 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 68 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 69 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 70 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 71 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 72 Constitution. 73 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 74 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 75 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 76 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 77 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 78 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 79 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 80 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 81 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 82 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 83 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 84 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 85 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 86 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 87 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 88 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 89 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 90 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 91 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 92 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 93 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 94 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 95 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 96 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 97 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 98 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 99 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 100 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 101 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 102 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 103 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 104 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 105 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 106 by the Legislature. 107 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 108 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 109 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 110 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 111 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 112 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 113 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 114 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 115 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 116 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 117 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 118 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 119 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 120 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 121 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 122 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 123 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 124 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 125 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 126 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 127 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 128 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 129 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 130 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 131 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 132 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 133 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 134 Constitution. 135 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 136 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 137 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 138 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 139 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 140 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 141 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 142 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 143 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 144 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 145 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 146 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 147 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 148 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 149 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 150 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 151 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 152 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 153 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 154 Constitution. 155 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 156 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 157 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 158 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 159 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 160 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 161 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 162 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 163 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 164 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 165 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 166 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 167 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 168 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 169 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 170 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 171 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 172 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 173 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 174 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 175 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 176 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 177 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 178 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 179 Constitution. 180 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 181 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 182 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 183 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and 184 current legal assistants; the names, home addresses, telephone 185 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 186 and children of current or former public defenders, assistant 187 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 188 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and 189 current legal assistants; and the names and locations of schools 190 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 191 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 192 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 193 conflict and civil regional counsel, and current legal 194 assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 195 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 196 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 197 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and 198 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 199 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 200 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 201 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 202 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 203 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 204 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 205 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 206 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 207 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 208 Constitution. 209 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 210 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 211 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 212 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 213 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 214 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 215 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 216 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 217 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 218 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 219 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 220 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 221 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 222 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 223 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 224 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 225 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 226 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 227 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 228 the State Constitution. 229 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 230 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 231 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 232 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 233 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 234 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 235 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 236 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 237 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 238 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 239 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 240 Constitution. 241 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 242 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 243 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 244 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 245 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 246 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 247 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 248 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 249 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 250 Constitution. 251 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 252 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 253 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 254 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 255 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 256 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 257 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 258 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 259 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 260 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 261 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 262 Constitution. 263 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 264 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 265 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 266 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 267 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 268 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 269 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 270 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 271 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 272 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 273 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 274 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 275 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 276 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 277 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 278 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 279 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 280 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 281 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 282 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 283 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 284 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 285 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 286 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 287 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 288 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 289 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 290 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 291 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 292 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 293 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 294 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 295 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 296 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 297 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 298 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 299 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 300 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 301 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 302 Constitution. 303 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 304 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 305 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 306 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 307 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 308 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 309 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 310 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 311 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 312 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 313 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 314 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 315 reenactment by the Legislature. 316 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 317 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 318 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 319 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 320 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 321 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 322 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 323 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 324 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 325 care facilities attended by the children of current county 326 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 327 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 328 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 329 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 330 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 331 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 332 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 333 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 334 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 335 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 336 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 337 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 338 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 339 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 340 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 341 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 342 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 343 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 344 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 345 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 346 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 347 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 348 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 349 Legislature. 350 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 351 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 352 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 353 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 354 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 355 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 356 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 357 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 358 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 359 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 360 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 361 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 362 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 363 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 364 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 365 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 366 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 367 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 368 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 369 States Senate. 370 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 371 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 372 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 373 plot identification number, legal property description, 374 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 375 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 376 home address, except for the city and zip code. 377 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 378 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 379 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 380 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 381 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 382 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 383 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 384 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 385 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 386 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 387 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 388 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 389 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 390 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 391 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 392 care facility attended by the minor child. 393 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 394 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 395 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 396 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 397 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 398 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 399 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 400 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 401 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 402 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 403 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 404 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 405 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 406 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 407 status. 408 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 409 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 410 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 411 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 412 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 413 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 414 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 415 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 416 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 417 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 418 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 419 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 420 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 421 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 422 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 423 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 424 person subject to the exemption. 425 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 426 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 427 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 428 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 429 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 430 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 431 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 432 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 433 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 434 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 435 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 436 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 437 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 438 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 439 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 440 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 441 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 442 public records of the agency. 443 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 444 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 445 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 446 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 447 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 448 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 449 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 450 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 451 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 452 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 453 the party authorized to receive such information. 454 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 455 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 456 exemption. 457 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 458 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 459 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 460 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 461 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 462 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 463 with The Florida Bar. 464 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 465 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 466 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 467 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 468 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 469 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 470 must submit a written request to release the removed information 471 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 472 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 473 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 474 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 475 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 476 file number for each document containing the information to be 477 released. 478 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 479 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 480 can request the county recorder to release a protected 481 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 482 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 483 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 484 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 485 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 486 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 487 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 488 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 489 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 490 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 491 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 492 release of any document pursuant to such request. 493 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 494 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of 495 birth, and places of employment of current legal assistants 496 employed by the office of the public defender and the office of 497 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the names, home 498 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 499 employment of the spouses and children of current legal 500 assistants employed by the office of the public defender and the 501 office of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; and the 502 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 503 by the children of current legal assistants employed by the 504 office of the public defender and the office of criminal 505 conflict and civil regional counsel be made exempt from s. 506 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the 507 State Constitution. While performing the duties of scheduling 508 meetings with criminal defendants, answering telephone calls, 509 responding to correspondence, and interacting in person with 510 criminal defendants, legal assistants may incur the ill will of 511 defendants and their associates and families. As a result, legal 512 assistants and their families may be targets for acts of 513 revenge. If such identifying and location information is 514 released, the safety of legal assistants and their families 515 could be seriously jeopardized. For this reason, the Legislature 516 finds that it is a public necessity that such identifying and 517 location information be made exempt from public records 518 requirements. The Legislature further finds that the harm that 519 may result from the release of such identifying and location 520 information outweighs any public benefit that may be derived 521 from the disclosure of the information. 522 Section 3.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 523 744.21031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 524 744.21031âPublic records exemption.â 525 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 526 (c)ââTelephone numbersâ has the same meaning as provided in 527 s. 119.071(4)(d)1.d. s. 119.071(4)(d)1.c. 528 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.